District of Columbia statutes.
21-2110

Construction of power relating to insurance transactions.

In a statutory power of attorney the language granting power with respect to insurance and annuity transactions empowers the agent to:

(1)

Continue, pay the premium or assessment on, modify, rescind, release, or terminate a contract procured by or on behalf of the principal which insures or provides an annuity to either the principal or another person, whether or not the principal is a beneficiary under the contract;

(2)

Procure new, different, and additional contracts of insurance and annuities for the principal and the principal’s spouse, children, and other dependents; and select the amount, type of insurance or annuity, and mode of payment;

(3)

Pay the premium or assessment on, modify, rescind, release, or terminate a contract of insurance or annuity procured by the agent;

(4)

Designate the beneficiary of the contract, but an agent may be named a beneficiary of the contract, or an extension, renewal, or substitute for it, only to the extent the agent was named as a beneficiary under a contract procured by the principal before executing the power of attorney;

(5)

Apply for and receive a loan on the security of the contract of insurance or annuity;

(6)

Surrender and receive the cash surrender value;

(7)

Exercise an election;

(8)

Change the manner of paying premiums;

(9)

Change or convert the type of insurance contract or annuity with respect to which the principal has or claims to have a power described in this section;

(10)

Change the beneficiary of a contract of insurance or annuity, but the agent may not be designated a beneficiary except to the extent permitted by paragraph (4) of this section;

(11)

Apply for and procure government aid to guarantee or pay premiums of a contract of insurance on the life of the principal;

(12)

Collect, sell, assign, hypothecate, borrow upon, or pledge the interest of the principal in a contract of insurance or annuity; and

(13)

Pay from proceeds or otherwise, compromise or contest, and apply for refunds in connection with, a tax or assessment levied by a taxing authority with respect to a contract of insurance or annuity or its proceeds or liability accruing by reason of the tax or assessment.

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-147, § 2, 45 DCR 3853
1981 Ed., § 21-2110.

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 10 of the Uniform Statutory Form Power of Attorney Act.

This section is based upon § 13 of the Uniform Statutory Form Power of Attorney Act.